West Virginia, session 2025, HB3520.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:That the balance of the funds available for expenditure in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the Fire Commission – Fire Marshal Fees, fund 6152, fiscal year 2025, organization 0619, be decreased by expiring the amount of $1,000,000; the Office of Energy – Energy Assistance, fund 3010, fiscal year 2025, organization 0307, be decreased by expiring the amount of $7,210; the Division of Natural Resources – Planning and Development Division, fund 3205, fiscal year 2025, organization 0310, be decreased by expiring the amount of $435,000;  the Division of Labor – Elevator Safety Fund, fund 3188, fiscal year 2025, organization 0308, be decreased by expiring the amount of $750,000;   the Contractor Licensing Board Fund, fund 3187, fiscal year 2025, organization 0951, be decreased by expiring the amount of $250,000; the Division of General Services, fund 2461, fiscal year 2025, organization 0211, be decreased by expiring the amount of $500,000; the Criminal Law Research Center Fund, fund 2420, fiscal year 2025, organization 0221, be decreased by expiring the amount of $3,000,000; the Treasurer’s Office, fund 8692, fiscal year 2025, organization 1300,  be decreased by expiring the amount of $20,000,000; the Insurance Commissioner – Insurance Commission Fund, fund 7152, fiscal year 2025, organization 0704, be decreased by expiring the amount of $30,000,000; the Division of Labor – Bedding and Upholstery Fund, fund 3198, fiscal year 2025, organization 0308, be decreased by expiring the amount of $250,000, to the surplus balance of the State Fund, General Revenue, to be available for appropriation during the fiscal year 2025.And, That the total appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to fund 0175, fiscal year 2025, organization 2300 be supplemented and amended by adding a new line item of appropriation as follows: Title II – Appropriations. Section 1. Appropriations from general revenue. 3 - Joint Expenses(W.V. Code Chapter 4)Fund 0175 FY 2025 Org 2300											        General	Appro-	Revenue	priation	Fund 1a	Joint Committee on Government and Finance - Surplus		XXXXX		56,192,210 Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home